en: V-Label International Vegan
xx: V-Label International Vegan

pl: Viva! Dla wegetarian i wegan, Znak V
xx: Viva! Dla wegetarian i wegan, Znak V

en: European Vegetarian Union Ovo-lacto-vegetarian
de: Europäische Vegetarier-Union Ovo-lacto-vegetarisch
fi: Euroopan vegetaariliitto lakto-ovo-vegetaarinen, EVU lakto-ovo-vegetaarinen
pl: V-Label Ovo-lacto-vegetarian, V-Label lakto-owo-wegetariańskie

en: European Vegetarian Union Lacto-vegetarian
de: Europäische Vegetarier-Union Lacto-vegetarisch
fi: Euroopan vegetaariliitto lakto-vegetaarinen, EVU lakto-vegetaarinen

en: European Vegetarian Union Ovo-vegetarian
de: Europäische Vegetarier-Union Ovo-vegetarisch
fi: Euroopan vegetaariliitto Ovo-vegetaarinen, EVU ovo-vegetaarinen

en: Vino de la Tierra
es: VT, V.T., Vino de la Tierra

en: Vino de Pago
ca: Vi de Pago
es: VP, V.P., Vino de Pago

en: With sulfites, Contains sulfites
bg: Със сулфити
ca: Amb sulfits, Conté sulfits
de: Enthält Sulfite
es: Con sulfitos, Contiene sulfitos
fi: Sisältää sulfiitteja
fr: Contient des sulfites, Présence de sulfites
hu: Szulfitokat tartalmaz, szulfitokkal
it: Contiene solfiti, con solfiti
pt: Com sulfitos, contém sulfitos
sv: Innehåller sulfiter, Innehåller sulfit
th: ใช้ซัลไฟต์

en: With natural sulfites, Contains natural sulfites
de: Enthält natürliche Sulfite, mit natürlichen Sulfiten
fi: Sisältää luontaisesti sulfiitteja, Sisältää luontaisia sulfiitteja
fr: Contient naturellement des sulfites
hu: Természetes szulfitokkal, természetes szulfitokat tartalmaz
it: Con solfiti naturali, contenente naturalmente solfiti, contiene sulfiti naturali
pt: Com sulfitos naturais, contém sulfitos naturais

en: Sulfites and SO2 > 10ppm
de: Sulfite und SO2 > 10ppm
fi: Sulfiitteja ja rikkioksidia > 10ppm
fr: Sulfites et SO2 > 10ppm
hu: Szulfitok és SO2 > 10ppm
it: Solfiti e SO2 > 10ppm
pt: Sulfitos e SO2 > 10ppm

en: Without sulfites
bg: Без сулфити
de: Ohne Sulfite
es: Sin sulfitos, Sin sulfito
fi: sulfiititon, ei sulfiitteja
fr: Sans sulfites, sans sulfite
hu: Szulfitmentes, szulfitok nélkül, szulfitokat nem tartalmaz
it: Senza solfiti
pt: Sem sulfitos, 0% sulfitos, não contém sulfitos
sv: Utan sulfiter

en: Without sulfur
ca: Sense sofre
de: Ohne Schwefel
fi: rikitön, ei sisällä rikkiä
fr: Sans soufre
he: ללא גופרית, נטול גופרית
hu: Kénmentes, ként nem tartalmaz
it: Senza zolfo
pt: Sem enxofre, sem súlfur, 0% enxofre, 0% súlfur, não contém enxofre, não contém súlfur

en: With Sunflower oil
bg: Със слънчогледово олио
ca: Amb oli de gira-sol
de: Mit Sonnenblumenöl
es: Con aceite de girasol
fi: sisältää auringonkukkaöljyä, auringonkukkaöljyllä
fr: À l'huile de tournesol, huile de tournesol
he: עם שמן חמנייה
hr: S uljem suncokreta
hu: Napraforgóolajjal
it: Con olio di semi di girasole
nl: Met zonnebloemolie
pl: Z olejem słonecznikowym, Zawiera olej słonecznikowy
pt: Com óleo de girassol, contém óleo de girasol

en: With sweeteners
bg: С подсладители
ca: Amb edulcorants
da: Indeholder sødestoffer
de: Mit Süßstoffen
es: Con edulcorantes, Con endulzantes artificiales
fi: sisältää makeutusaineita, sisältää makeutusainetta
fr: Avec édulcorants
he: עם ממתיקים
hr: Sa zaslađivačima
hu: Édesítőszerrel, Édesítővel
it: Con dolcificanti, Con edulcoranti
nb: Inneholder søtningsmiddel
nl: Met kunstmatige zoetstoffen
pl: Zawiera słodziki, Zawiera substancje słodzące
pt: Com adoçantes, com edulcorantes, contém adoçantes, contém edulcorantes
sv: Innehåller sötningsmedel
th: ใช้น้ำตาลเทียม

en: With sweeteners (steviol glycosides)
sv: Innehåller sötningsmedel (steviolglykosider)

en: Without sweeteners
bg: Без подсладители
ca: Sense edulcorants
da: Uden sødestoffer
de: Ohne Süßungsmittel
es: Sin edulcorantes, Sin endulzantes
fi: makeutusaineeton, ei makeutusaineita
fr: Sans édulcorants
he: ללא ממתיקים
hr: Bez zaslađivača
hu: Édesítőszer nélkül, Édesítő nélkül
it: Senza dolcificanti
nl: Zonder zoetstoffen
pl: Bez słodzików, Nie zawiera słodzików
pt: Sem adoçantes, sem edulcorantes, sem adoçantes, sem edulcorantes, 0% adoçantes, 0% edulcorantes
sv: Utan sötningsmedel

en: With fluorite
sv: Innehåller fluor

en: With xylitol
sv: Innehåller xylitol

en: 100% muscle
ca: Múscul 100%
de: 100% Muskel
es: 100% musculo
fi: 100% lihasta
fr: 100% muscle, v 100% muscle, viande 100% muscle
he: 100% שריר
it: 100% muscolo
pt: 100% músculo

en: Without brown muscle
de: Ohne braunen Muskel
es: Sin músculo marrón
fi: ilman ruskeaa lihasta
fr: Sans muscle brun, Sans chair brune
it: Senza muscolo marrone
nl: Zonder bruine spier
pt: Sem músculo marrom